Idaho, session 2026, S1434.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Division of Welfare the following amounts to be expended according to the
designated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. SELF-RELIANCE OPERATIONS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $3,005,100 $2,152,000 $5,157,100
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 0 1,677,100 1,677,100
TOTAL $3,005,100 $3,829,100 $6,834,200
II. BENEFIT PAYMENTS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $98,300 $98,300
GRAND TOTAL $3,005,100 $3,829,100 $98,300 $6,932,500
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Di-
vision of Welfare is hereby reduced by the following amounts from the des-
ignated programs and expense classes from the Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:


FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL BENEFIT
COSTS PAYMENTS TOTAL
Self-Reliance Operations $3,005,100 $3,005,100
Benefit Payments 0 $98,300 98,300
TOTAL $3,005,100 $98,300 $3,103,400
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.